Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,122
Directors' action.

(MBCA 8.62) (a) Directors' action respecting
a director's conflicting interest transaction is effective for purposes of
subdivision (b)(1) of section 21-2,121 if the transaction has been authorized
by the affirmative vote of a majority, but no fewer than two, of the qualified
directors who voted on the transaction after required disclosure by the conflicted
director of information not already known by such qualified directors or after
modified disclosure in compliance with subsection (b) of this section if:

(1) The qualified directors
have deliberated and voted outside the presence of and without the participation
by any other director; and

(2) When the action has been taken by a committee,
all members of the committee were qualified directors and either (i) the committee
was composed of all the qualified directors on the board of directors or (ii)
the members of the committee were appointed by the affirmative vote of a majority
of the qualified directors on the board.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section,
when a transaction is a director's conflicting interest transaction only because
a related person described in subdivision (5)(v) or (vi) of section 21-2,120
is a party to or has a material financial interest in the transaction, the
conflicted director is not obligated to make required disclosure to the extent
that the director reasonably believes that doing so would violate a duty imposed
under law, a legally enforceable obligation of confidentiality, or a professional
ethics rule if the conflicted director discloses to the qualified directors
voting on the transaction:

(1) All information required to be disclosed that
is not so violative;

(2)
The existence and nature of the director's conflicting interest; and

(3) The nature of the
conflicted director's duty not to disclose the confidential information.

(c) A majority, but no
fewer than two, of all the qualified directors on the board of directors,
or on the committee, constitutes a quorum for purposes of action that complies
with this section.

(d)
Where directors' action under this section does not satisfy a quorum or voting
requirement applicable to the authorization of the transaction by reason of
the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or a provision of law, independent
action to satisfy those authorization requirements must be taken by the board
of directors or a committee in which action directors who are not qualified
directors may participate.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 122.
January 1, 2017